Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5649.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8-10-23.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-10 entitled "Family
Court" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-10-23.1. Statewide juvenile hearing board.
(a) The chief judge of the family court shall appoint a statewide juvenile hearing board
coordinator who is qualified by education, training, previous experience in professional social
welfare, personality, character, and special aptitude for the work, to serve at the pleasure of the
chief judge. The juvenile hearing board coordinator shall provide education, training, data
collection and analysis, coordination, and assistance to cities and towns in the establishment and
maintenance of juvenile hearing boards and teen courts. Juvenile hearing boards and/or teen courts
shall report any data deemed necessary by the family court to perform the functions of the juvenile
hearing board coordinator. No juvenile hearing board or teen court in the State of Rhode Island
shall hear, or dispose of offenses that constitute felony offenses if committed by an adult, except
by the express written consent of the chief justice of the family court; nor shall any juvenile hearing
board or teen court hear or dispose of any offense which has been amended from a felony offense
to a misdemeanor offense, except by the express written consent of the chief justice of the family
court. Juveniles, wherever they may live, upon a decision to refer the juvenile to the juvenile
hearing board or teen court, shall be referred to the hearing board or teen court in the city or town
where the offense was committed; provided, however, if the city or town does not have a hearing
board or teen court, the juvenile shall be referred to the hearing board or teen court where the

juvenile resides. The Statewide hearing board coordinator is responsible for setting up a statewide
community service program which may be utilized by any hearing board or teen court.
(b) The position of statewide juvenile hearing board coordinator is a pilot program which
shall commence on July 1, 1998 and terminate on June 30, 2001, unless extended by the general
assembly.
(c) The juvenile hearing board may order a juvenile to attend a rehabilitative driving course
operated under the jurisdiction of a college or university accredited by the State of Rhode Island if
the circumstances of the offense indicate these programs would be beneficial to the juvenile. The
hearing board, in its discretion, may include in its order a provision to pay reasonable tuition for
the course unless the juvenile demonstrates an inability to pay. The order shall contain findings of
fact and a copy shall be submitted by the board to the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal. Failure
to comply with an order of attendance, after notice and hearing, shall result in a show cause hearing
conducted before the traffic tribunal to determine whether grounds exist for the suspension or
revocation of a person's license or registration. Notice and hearings before the traffic tribunal shall
be pursuant to the provisions of chapter 41.1 of title 31.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001446
========
LC001446 - Page 2 of 3